Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.150

License—Display.

Every person holding a license under the provisions of this chapter shall conspicuously display it in his or her principal place of business, together with the annual renewal license certificate.

[ 2011 c 336 s 500; 1941 c 71 s 18; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-18.]